Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-3006
Unfair trade practice.

Failure to meet any requirement of the Unclaimed Life Insurance Benefits Act shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 2017, LB137, § 6.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.